csv2fst/yaml_output/VII_CNJ_e.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: ateg
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: atenig
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: atesinog
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: atesininig
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: ategiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: atenigiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: atesinoogiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: atesininigiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: ategwen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: atenigwen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: ategobanen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: atenigobanen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: atesinoogobanen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: atesininigobanen
